Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.070

Arraignment when treatment rejected.

When treatment is either not recommended or not approved by the judge, or the petitioner declines to accept the treatment plan, the petitioner shall be arraigned on the charge.

[ 1985 c 352 s 10; 1975 1st ex.s. c 244 s 7.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—Severability—1985 c 352: See notes following RCW 10.05.010.